Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-602.02
Web site; contents; link to Department of Administrative
Services web site; contents; actions by agency, board, commission, or department
prohibited; Department of Administrative Services; duties.

(1)(a) Not later than January 1, 2010, the web site established,
developed, and maintained by the State Treasurer pursuant to subdivision (9)
of section 84-602 shall provide such information as will document the sources
of all tax receipts and the expenditure of state funds by all agencies, boards,
commissions, and departments of the state.

(b) The State Treasurer shall, in appropriate detail, cause
to be published on the web site:

(i) The identity, principal location, and amount of funds
received or expended by the State of Nebraska and all of its agencies, boards,
commissions, and departments;

(ii) The funding or expending agency, board, commission, or
department;

(iii) The budget program source;

(iv) The amount, date, purpose, and recipient of all disbursed
funds; and

(v) Such other relevant information as will further the intent
of enhancing the transparency of state government financial operations to
its citizens and taxpayers. The web site shall include data for fiscal year
2008-09 and each fiscal year thereafter.

(2) Beginning July 1, 2010, the data shall be available on
the web site no later than thirty days after the end of the preceding fiscal
year.

(3)(a) Beginning July
1, 2014, the web site described in this section shall include a link to the
web site of the Department of Administrative Services. The department's web
site shall contain:

(i) A data base that includes a copy of each active contract that
is a basis for an expenditure of state funds, including any amendment to such
contract and any document incorporated by reference in such contract. For
purposes of this subdivision, amendment means an agreement to modify a contract
which has been reduced to writing and signed by each party to the contract,
an agreement to extend the duration of a contract, or an agreement to renew
a contract. The data base shall be accessible by the public and searchable
by vendor, by agency, board, commission, or department, and by dollar amount.
All agencies, boards, commissions, and departments of the state shall provide
to the Department of Administrative Services, in electronic form, copies of
such contracts for inclusion in the data base beginning with contracts that
are active on and after January 1, 2014; and

(ii) A data base that
includes copies of all expired contracts which were previously included in
the data base described in subdivision (3)(a)(i) of this section. The data
base required under this subdivision shall be accessible by the public and
searchable by vendor, by agency, board, commission, or department, and by
dollar amount.

(b) The following shall be redacted or withheld from any contract
before such contract is included in a data base pursuant to subdivision (3)(a)
of this section:

(i) The social security number or federal tax identification number
of any individual or business;

(ii) Protected health information as such
term is defined under the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability
Act of 1996, as such act existed on January 1, 2013;

(iii) Any information
which may be withheld from the public under section 84-712.05; or

(iv) Any information
that is confidential under state or federal law, rule, or regulation.

(c) The following contracts
shall be exempt from the requirements of subdivision (3)(a) of this section:

(i) Contracts entered
into by the Department of Health and Human Services that are letters of agreement
for the purpose of providing specific services to a specifically named individual
and his or her family;

(ii)
Contracts entered into by the University of Nebraska or any of the Nebraska
state colleges for the purpose of providing specific services or financial
assistance to a specifically named individual and his or her family;

(iii) Contracts entered
into by the Department of Veterans' Affairs under section 80-401 or 80-403
for the purpose of providing aid to a specifically named veteran and his or
her family;

(iv)
Contracts entered into by the State Energy Office for the purpose of providing
financing from the Dollar and Energy Saving Loan program; and

(v) Contracts of employment
for employees of any agency, board, commission, or department of the state.
The exemption provided in this subdivision shall not apply to contracts entered
into by any agency, board, commission, or department of the state to obtain
the services of an independent contractor.

(d) No agency, board, commission, or department
of the state shall structure a contract to avoid any of the requirements of
subdivision (3)(a) of this section.

(e) The Department of Administrative Services
shall adopt policies and procedures regarding the creation and maintenance
of the data bases required under this section and the process by which agencies,
boards, commissions, and departments of the state provide copies of the contracts
required under this section.

(4) All agencies, boards, commissions, and departments
of the state shall provide to the State Treasurer, at such times and in such
form as designated by the State Treasurer, such information as is necessary
to accomplish the purposes of the Taxpayer Transparency Act.

(5) Nothing in this section requires the disclosure of information
which is considered confidential under state or federal law or is not a public
record under section 84-712.05.

(6)(a) For purposes of this
section, expenditure of state funds means all expenditures of appropriated
or nonappropriated funds by an agency, board, commission, or department of
the state from the state treasury in forms including, but not limited to:

(i) Grants;

(ii) Contracts;

(iii) Subcontracts;

(iv) State aid to political subdivisions; and

(v) Tax refunds or credits that may be disclosed pursuant
to the Nebraska Advantage Act, the Nebraska Advantage Microenterprise Tax
Credit Act, the Nebraska Advantage Research and Development Act, or the Nebraska
Advantage Rural Development Act.

(b) Expenditure of state funds does not include the transfer
of funds between two agencies, boards, commissions, or departments of the
state or payments of state or federal assistance to an individual.

Laws 2009, LB16, § 3;

Laws 2013, LB429, § 2.

Nebraska Advantage Act, see section 77-5701.

Nebraska Advantage Microenterprise Tax Credit Act, see section 77-5901.

Nebraska Advantage Research and Development Act, see section 77-5801.

Nebraska Advantage Rural Development Act, see section 77-27,187.